Missouri, session 2026, HCR36.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, Josephine Baker was born in St. Louis, Missouri, on June 3, 1906; and

WHEREAS, Baker was a celebrated performer, headlining revues in Paris after
getting her start in St. Louis vaudeville acts; and

WHEREAS, Baker was the first black woman to star in a major motion picture, in
1927; and

WHEREAS, Baker participated extensively in the French Resistance during World
War II, and also aided the British Secret Intelligence Service and the United States Office of
Strategic Services:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby designate June 3rd of each year as "Josephine Baker Day"
in Missouri, in celebration of the legacy of Josephine Baker, a global icon in the arts, human
rights activism, and democracy; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔